Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-711
Act; applicability.

The Equipment Business Regulation Act shall apply to all dealer agreements in effect on May 2, 1991, which have no expiration date and are continuing agreements and to all dealer agreements entered into or renewed on or after May 2, 1991. Any dealer agreement in effect on May 2, 1991, which will terminate on a subsequent date shall be governed by the law as it existed prior to May 2, 1991.

Laws 1991, LB 123, § 11.